Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF2132.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin [1.1466] STATE FOSSIL. new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Designation. new text end new text begin Castoroides ohioensis, commonly known as the giant beaver, is designated as the official state fossil of the state of Minnesota. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Photograph. new text end new text begin A photograph of the giant beaver, approved by the commissioner of natural resources, shall be preserved and may be displayed in the Office of the Secretary of State. new text end